Missouri, session 2026, HB3258.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 285, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto six new sections, to be
known as sections 285.2000, 285.2003, 285.2006, 285.2009, 285.2012, and 285.2015, to read
as follows:
285.2000. For the purposes of sections 285.2000 to 285.2015, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Affiliate", a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more
intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another
person. For the purposes of this subdivision, "control" means the possession, directly or
indirectly, of more than fifty percent of the power to direct or cause the direction of the
management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting shares,
by contract, or otherwise;
(2) "Aggregated data", information that an employer has combined or collected
in summary or other form such that the data cannot be identified with any individual;
(3) "Defined time period", any unit of time measurement less than or equal to
the duration of an employee's shift, and includes hours, minutes, and seconds and any
fraction thereof;
(4) "Department", the department of labor and industrial relations;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3258 2
(5) "Designated employee representative", any employee representative
including, but not limited to, an authorized employee representative that has a
collective bargaining relationship with the employer;
(6) "Director", the director of the department of labor and industrial relations
or the director's designee;
(7) "Employee", an employee who is not exempt under subdivision (3) of section
290.500 and works at a warehouse distribution center;
(8) "Employee work-speed data", information an employer collects, stores,
analyzes, or interprets relating to an individual employee's performance of a quota
including, but not limited to, quantities of tasks performed, quantities of items or
materials handled or produced, rates or speeds of tasks performed, measurements or
metrics of employee performance in relation to a quota, and time categorized as
performing tasks or not performing tasks. Employee work-speed data does not include
qualitative performance assessments, personnel records, or itemized wage statements
pursuant to department rules, except for any content of those records that includes
employee work-speed data as defined in this subdivision;
(9) "Employer", a person who directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any
other person, including through the services of a third-party employer, temporary
services, or staffing agency, independent contractor, or any similar entity, at any time,
employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of one
hundred or more employees at a single warehouse distribution center in the state or one
thousand or more cumulative employees at one or more warehouse distribution centers
in the state. For the purposes of determining the number of employees employed at a
single warehouse distribution center or cumulatively at one or more warehouse
distribution centers, all employees employed directly or indirectly, or through a staffing
agency or any other person in a contractual agreement with the employer, and all
employees employed by an employer and its affiliates shall be counted. For the
purposes of determining responsible employers, all agents or other persons and affiliates
shall be deemed employers and are jointly and severally responsible for compliance with
sections 285.2000 to 285.2015;
(10) "Person", an individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership,
limited liability partnership, limited liability company, business trust, estate, trust,
association, joint venture, agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial
entity, whether domestic or foreign;
(11) "Quota", a work performance standard, whether required or
recommended, where:

HB 3258 3
(a) An employee is assigned or required to perform at a specified productivity
speed, or perform a quantified number of tasks, or to handle or produce a quantified
amount of material, within a defined time period and under which the employee may
suffer an adverse employment action if they fail to complete the performance standard;
or
(b) An employee's actions are categorized as time performing tasks, where the
employee may suffer an adverse employment action if they fail to meet the performance
standard;
(12) "Warehouse distribution center", an establishment engaged in activities as
defined by any of the following North American Industry Classification System
(NAICS) codes, however such establishment is denominated:
(a) 493 for warehousing and storage, but does not include 493130 for farm
product warehousing and storage;
(b) 423 for merchant wholesalers, durable goods;
(c) 424 for merchant wholesalers, nondurable goods; or
(d) 454110 for electronic shopping and mail-order houses.
285.2003. 1. An employer shall provide to each employee, upon hire, or within
thirty days of August 28, 2026, a written description of:
(1) Each quota to which the employee is subject, including the quantified
number of tasks to be performed or materials to be produced or handled within a
defined time period;
(2) Any potential adverse employment action that could result from failure to
meet each quota; and
(3) Any incentives or bonus programs associated with meeting or exceeding each
quota.
2. Whenever there is a change to a quota that results in a different quota than
the most recent written description provided to the employee, the employer shall:
(1) Notify the employee orally or in writing as soon as practicable and before the
employee is subject to the new quota; and
(2) Provide the employee with an updated written description of each quota to
which the employee is subject within two business days of the quota change.
3. Whenever an employer takes an adverse action against an employee in whole
or in part for failure to meet a quota, the employer shall provide that employee with the
applicable quota for the employee and the personal work-speed data for the employee
that was the basis for the adverse action.

HB 3258 4
4. The written description shall be understandable, in plain language, and in the
employee's preferred language. The department may adopt rules regarding the format,
plain language, and language access requirements for the written description.
5. (1) The time period considered in a quota, including time designated as
productive time or time on task, shall include:
(a) Time for rest breaks and reasonable time to travel to designated locations for
rest breaks;
(b) Reasonable travel time to on-site designated meal break locations. Meal
breaks are not considered time on task or productive time unless the employee is
required by the employer to remain on duty on the premises or at a prescribed worksite
in the interest of the employer;
(c) Time to perform any activity required by the employer in order to do the
work subject to any quota;
(d) Time to use the bathroom, including reasonable travel time; and
(e) Time to take any actions necessary for the employee to exercise the
employee's right to a safe and healthful workplace including, but not limited to, time to
access tools or safety equipment necessary to perform the employee's duties.
(2) Reasonable travel time shall include consideration of the architecture and
geography of the facility and the location within the facility that the employee is located
at the time.
6. (1) A quota violates sections 285.2000 to 285.2015 if the quota:
(a) Does not provide sufficient time as required under subsection 5 of this
section;
(b) Prevents the performance of any activity required by the employer for the
employee to do the work subject to any quota;
(c) Prevents the performance of any activity related to occupational safety and
health required by the employer for the employee to do the work subject to any quota;
or
(d) Exposes an employee to occupational safety and health hazards in violation
of the requirements of state or federal law and the applicable rules or regulations.
(2) An employee is not required to meet a quota that violates the provisions of
sections 285.2000 to 285.2015.
(3) An employer shall not take adverse action against an employee for failing to
meet a quota that violates sections 285.2000 to 285.2015 or that was not disclosed to the
employee as required under the provisions of sections 285.2000 to 285.2015.

HB 3258 5
(4) All provisions of section 285.2006 apply to any person who complains to the
employer, the director, or any local, state, or federal governmental agency or official
related to a quota alleging any violations of sections 285.2000 to 285.2015.
7. (1) An employer shall establish, maintain, and preserve contemporaneous,
true, and accurate records of the following:
(a) Each employee's own personal work-speed data;
(b) The aggregated work-speed data for similar employees at the same
warehouse distribution center; and
(c) The written descriptions of each quota the employee was provided, as
required under this section.
(2) (a) The required records shall be maintained and preserved throughout the
duration of each employee's period of employment and for the period required by this
subsection.
(b) Except as required under paragraph (c) of this subdivision, subsequent to an
employee's separation from the employer, records relating to the six-month period prior
to the date of the employee's separation from the employer shall be preserved for at
least one year from the date of the employee's separation.
(c) Where an employer has taken adverse action against an employee in whole or
in part for failure to meet a quota, the employer shall preserve the records relating to
the basis for the adverse action for at least three years from the date of the adverse
action.
(d) The employer shall make records available to the director upon request.
(3) Nothing in this subsection requires an employer to collect or keep such
records if the employer does not use quotas or monitor work-speed data.
(4) An employer who fails to allow adequate inspection of records in an
inspection by the department within a reasonable time period shall not use such records
in any appeal to challenge the correctness of any citation and notice issued by the
department.
8. (1) An employee has the right to request, at any time, a written description of
each quota to which the employee is subject, a copy of the employee's own personal
work-speed data for the prior six months, and a redacted copy of the prior six months of
aggregated work-speed data for similar employees at the same warehouse distribution
center.
(2) A former employee has the right to request, within one year subsequent to
the date of his or her separation from the employer, a written description of the quota to
which the employee was subject as of the date of his or her separation, a copy of the
employee's own personal work-speed data for the six months prior to his or her date of

HB 3258 6
separation, and a redacted copy of aggregated work-speed data for similar employees at
the same warehouse distribution center for the six months prior to their date of
separation.
(3) An employer shall provide records requested under this subsection at no cost
to the employee or former employee.
(4) An employer shall provide records requested under this subsection as soon as
practicable and subject to the following:
(a) Requested records of written descriptions of a quota shall be provided no
100 later than seven business days following the date of the receipt of the request; and
101 (b) Requested personal work-speed data and aggregated work-speed data shall
102 be provided no later than seven business days following the date of the receipt of the
103 request.
104 (5) Nothing in this subsection requires an employer to use quotas or monitor
105 work-speed data. An employer that does not use quotas or monitor work-speed data
106 has no obligation to provide records under this section.
285.2006. 1. A person including, but not limited to, an employer, his or her
agent, or person acting as or on behalf of a hiring entity, or the officer or agent of any
entity, business, corporation, partnership, or limited liability company, shall not
discharge or in any way retaliate, discriminate, or take adverse action against an
employee or former employee for exercising any rights established under sections
285.2000 to 285.2015, or for being perceived as exercising rights established under such
sections including, but not limited to:
(1) Initiating a request for information about a quota or personal work-speed
data; and
(2) Making a complaint to the employer, the director, or any local, state, or
federal governmental agency or official, related to a quota that is allegedly in violation
of sections 285.2000 to 285.2015.
2. An employee or former employee need not explicitly refer to sections 285.2000
to 285.2015 or the rights established in these sections to be protected from an adverse
action. The protection provided under this section applies to former employees and to
employees who mistakenly but in good faith allege violations of sections 285.2000 to
285.2015.
3. (1) If a person takes adverse action against an employee or former employee
within ninety days of the employee engaging or attempting to engage in activities
protected by sections 285.2000 to 285.2015, there is a rebuttable presumption that the
adverse action is a retaliatory action in violation of sections 285.2000 to 285.2015.
(2) The presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that:

HB 3258 7
(a) The action was taken for other permissible reasons; and
(b) The engaging or attempting to engage in activities protected by sections
285.2000 to 285.2015 was not a motivating factor in the adverse action.
4. The department shall carry out and enforce the provisions of sections
285.2000 to 285.2015 under the procedures established and any applicable rules.
285.2009. 1. (1) An employee may file a complaint with the department alleging
a violation of sections 285.2000 to 285.2015 or the applicable rules. The department
shall investigate the complaint, or it may designate the attorney general as its agent to
investigate the complaint. The department shall not investigate any such alleged
violation of rights that occurred more than three years before the date that the employee
filed the complaint.
(2) If an employee files a timely complaint with the department, the department
shall investigate the complaint and issue either a citation and notice of assessment or a
determination of compliance within ninety days after the date on which the department
received the complaint, unless the complaint is otherwise resolved. The department may
extend the period by providing advance written notice to the employee and the employer
setting forth good cause for an extension of the period and specifying the duration of the
extension.
(3) The department shall send the citation and notice of assessment or the
determination of compliance to both the employer and the employee by service of
process or using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be
confirmed to their last known addresses.
2. If the department's investigation finds that the employee's allegation cannot
be substantiated, the department shall issue a determination of compliance to the
employee and the employer detailing such finding.
3. The director may initiate an investigation without an employee's complaint to
ensure compliance with sections 285.2000 to 285.2015.
4. The department may request an employer perform a self-audit of any records
relating to sections 285.2000 to 285.2015 which shall be provided within a reasonable
time. Reasonable timelines shall be specified in the self-audit request. The department
shall determine reasonable time based on the number of affected employees and the
period of time covered by the self-audit. The records examined by the employer in
order to perform the self-audit shall be made available to the department upon request.
5. Upon the department's request, an employer shall notify affected employees in
writing that the department is conducting an investigation. The department may
require the employer to include a general description of each investigation as part of the
notification, including the allegations and whether the notified employee may be

HB 3258 8
affected. The employer may consult with the department to provide the information for
the description of the notification or investigation.
6. If the department determines that the employer has violated a requirement of
sections 285.2000 to 285.2015 or any rule adopted under the provisions of such sections,
the department also may order the employer to pay a civil penalty of not less than two
hundred fifty dollars. The penalty for the first violation shall not exceed two hundred
fifty dollars. The department may, at any time, waive or reduce any civil penalty
assessed against an employer under this section if the department determines that the
employer has taken corrective action to remedy a violation. The department shall adopt
rules creating a schedule to enhance penalties, based on repeat violations by the
employer.
7. Upon receiving a complaint, the department may request or subpoena the
records of the warehouse distribution center.
8. For enforcement actions under sections 285.2000 to 285.2015, if any person
fails to pay an assessment under this section, or under any rule under this section, after
it has become a final and unappealable order, or after a court has entered final
judgment in favor of the agency, the director or the attorney general may initiate
collection procedures as authorized by law.
9. If the department finds that a quota violates sections 285.2000 to 285.2015, the
department may order the employer to review and provide a corrected written quota to
the affected employee or employees within fifteen calendar days and place a letter in the
employee's personnel file to acknowledge the correction.
10. In addition to any enforcement authority provided under sections 285.2000
to 285.2015 or the applicable rules, the department or the attorney general may enforce
the provisions of sections 285.2000 to 285.2015 or the applicable rules by filing an action
in the circuit court for the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred. If
the department prevails, it is entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and costs in an
amount to be determined by the court.
285.2012. 1. For enforcement actions under sections 285.2000 to 285.2015, a
person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a citation and notice of assessment or
determination of compliance by the department or any rules adopted under sections
285.2000 to 285.2015 may appeal the citation and notice of assessment or determination
of compliance to the director by filing a notice of appeal with the administrative hearing
commission under the provisions of chapter 621 within fifteen calendar days of the
department's issuance of the citation and notice of assessment or determination of
compliance. A citation and notice of assessment or determination of compliance not

HB 3258 9
appealed within fifteen calendar days is final and binding, and not subject to further
appeal.
2. A notice of appeal filed with the administrative hearing commission under this
section stays the effectiveness of the citation and notice of assessment or determination
of compliance pending final review of the appeal by the administrative hearing
commission.
3. The standard of review by the administrative law judge of an appealed
citation and notice of assessment shall be de novo. Any party who seeks to challenge an
initial order shall file a petition for administrative review with the administrative
hearing commission within thirty days after service of the initial order.
4. The final order of the administrative hearing commission is subject to judicial
review.
5. Orders that are not appealed within the time period specified in this section
and chapter 621 are final and binding, and not subject to further appeal.
6. An employer who fails to allow adequate inspection of records in an
investigation by the department under sections 285.2000 to 285.2015 within a reasonable
time period shall not use such records in any appeal under this section to challenge the
correctness of any determination by the department of the penalty assessed.
285.2015. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
for the administration of sections 285.2000 to 285.2015. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔